District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2506

Licenses — Required.

Repealed.

History

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 5
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2106.
1973 Ed., § 2-1406.